Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-108
State gem; blue agate.

The chalcedony stone, known as blue agate, is hereby declared the state gem stone of Nebraska.

Laws 1967, c. 608, § 1, p. 2057;

R.R.S.1943, § 84-725.